Illinois, session 104th, HB967.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Milwaukee Avenue Polish Heritage Corridor 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 27/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Milwaukee Avenue Polish Heritage Corridor Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-1079, eff. 1-1-23.)